Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 847 of Title 74, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Hire


Oklahomans Act”.


B. The Legislature finds that:


1. Immigration classification and visa issuance are federal


matters; however, Oklahoma public employment funded by Oklahoma


taxpayers is a matter of state sovereignty;





Req. No. 3427 Page 1


2. No provision of federal law requires this state or its


political subdivisions to participate in discretionary federal visa


labor programs; and


3. This state has a compelling interest in prioritizing public


employment opportunities for its citizens.


C. For the purposes of this act:


1. “H-1B visa program” means employment authorized under


Section 101(a)(15)(H)(i)(b) of the Immigration and Nationality Act;


2. “Optional practical training” means employment authorization


granted pursuant to federal regulations governing F-1 nonimmigrant


student status; and


3. “State entity” means any agency, board, commission,


department, authority, public trust, political subdivision, or


public institution of higher education of this state.


D. 1. No state entity shall employ any individual pursuant to


either the H-1B visa program or the optional practical training


authorization.


2. No state entity shall sponsor, petition for, renew, or


extend employment under the programs described in paragraph 1 of


this subsection.


E. This act shall apply only to:


1. Employment agreements entered into on or after the effective


date of this act; and



Req. No. 3427 Page 2


2. Renewals, extensions, or modifications of employment


agreements occurring on or after the effective date of this act.


F. Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair vested


contractual rights prior to the effective date of this act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3427 MSBB 1/15/2026 11:52:07 AM



























Req. No. 3427 Page 3